Florida, session 2026, HB1253.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present paragraphs (c) through (n) of
subsection (2) of section 1006.20, Florida Statutes, are
redesignated as paragraphs (d) through (o), respectively, and a
new paragraph (c) is added to that subsection, to read:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1253-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1253 2026
1006.20 Athletics in public K-12 schools.—
(2) ADOPTION OF BYLAWS, POLICIES, OR GUIDELINES.—
(c) The FHSAA shall adopt bylaws that authorize a coach,
employed by a school or school district, to support the welfare
of a student he or she coaches by using personal funds to
provide, in good faith, effects such as food, transportation,
physical therapy, and rehabilitation services. The bylaws must
require a parent to provide written consent before a coach may
provide such support to a student. The bylaws must also define
the term "athletic team" to include junior varsity and varsity
levels, based on designation requirements of s. 1006.205(3)(a),
and restrict such use of funds to one coach per athletic team.
1. A coach who uses personal funds to provide such effects
must report such use to the FHSAA in a manner provided by FHSAA
bylaw.
2. Such use of personal funds is presumed not to be an
impermissible benefit, unless such use of personal funds is:
a. Not reported;
b. Reported and deemed not to be in good faith by the
FHSAA; or
c. Used for recruiting purposes.
3. Beginning July 1, 2026, the maximum amount of personal
funds a coach may use per athletic team per year is $15,000.

Any other organization governing interscholastic athletic
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1253-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1253 2026
competition in this state may adopt bylaws similar to those
required by this paragraph.
Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 768.135, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
768.135 Volunteer team physicians; immunity.—
(3) A practitioner licensed under chapter 458, chapter
459, chapter 460, or s. 464.012 or registered under s. 464.0123
who gratuitously and in good faith conducts an evaluation
pursuant to s. 1006.20(2)(d) s. 1006.20(2)(c) is not liable for
any civil damages arising from that evaluation unless the
evaluation was conducted in a wrongful manner.
Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (17) of section
1002.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.20 K-12 student and parent rights.—Parents of public
school students must receive accurate and timely information
regarding their child's academic progress and must be informed
of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12
students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory
rights including, but not limited to, the following:
(17) ATHLETICS; PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL.—
(b) Medical evaluation and electrocardiogram.—Before
participating in athletics, students must:
1. Satisfactorily pass a medical evaluation each year,
unless the parent objects in writing based on religious tenets
or practices, in accordance with s. 1006.20(2)(e) s.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1253-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1253 2026
1006.20(2)(d); and
2. As applicable under s. 1006.20, receive an
electrocardiogram, unless the parent objects in writing based on
religious tenets or practices or secures a certificate of
medical exception in accordance with s. 1006.20(2)(e) s.
1006.20(2)(d) or the school district is unable to obtain a
public or private partnership for the provision of an
electrocardiogram pursuant to s. 1006.165.
Section 4. Subsection (3) of section 1006.165, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1006.165 Well-being of students participating in
extracurricular activities; training.—
(3) Each school district must pursue public and private
partnerships to provide low-cost electrocardiograms to the
student. A student athlete is exempt from the requirement in s.
1006.20(2)(d)4. s. 1006.20(2)(c)4. if he or she resides in a
school district that is unable to obtain a public or private
partnership to provide an electrocardiogram at a rate of less
than $50 per student.
Section 5. Paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of section
1012.468, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1012.468 Exceptions to certain fingerprinting and criminal
history checks.—
(2) A district school board shall exempt from the
100 screening requirements set forth in ss. 1012.465 and 1012.467
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1253-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1253 2026
101 the following noninstructional contractors:
102 (g) An investigator for the Florida High School Athletic
103 Association (FHSAA) who meets the requirements under s.
104 1006.20(2)(f) s. 1006.20(2)(e).
105 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1253-02-c2